Georgia statutes. TITLE 27 Game And Fish
PART 1 General Provisions

Cross references.

Cruelty to animals, §

16-12-4

.

27-3-1.
Requirement of permission to hunt on lands of another; written permission; enforcement; immunity of landowner from civil liability.

It shall be unlawful for any person to hunt upon the lands of another or enter upon the lands of another in pursuit of wildlife, with or without a license, without first obtaining permission from the landowner or lessee of such land or the lessee of the game rights of such land. Such permission shall not be required, however, if the person hunting or a member of the person’s family is the owner of the land, the lessee of the land, or the lessee of the game rights of the land. For the purposes of this Code section only, “family” means mother, father, son, daughter, brother, sister, uncle, aunt, son-in-law, daughter-in-law, niece, nephew, grandson, granddaughter, grandmother, grandfather, or spouse.

If the land is posted and if the owner of the land, lessee of the land, or lessee of the game rights of the land has informed a law enforcement agency that permission to hunt upon the land must be in writing, then the permission required by subsection (a) of this Code section must be in writing and must be carried on the hunter’s person.

Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, any person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $975.00.

Any person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section for the second time within a two-year period shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $2,000.00; and the department shall revoke the right of such person to a hunting license for a period of one year for each such second conviction within a two-year period.

Any person who violates subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section for a third or subsequent time within a three-year period shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of a high and aggravated nature and shall be punished by a fine of not less than $3,000.00; and the department shall revoke the right of such person to a hunting license for a period of three years for each such third or subsequent conviction within a three-year period.

The minimum fines and revocation periods specified in this subsection shall not apply, however, to an offender who is 17 years of age or younger.

It shall be the duty of any peace officer whose duty it is to preserve the peace or make arrests or enforce the law to enforce this Code section.

Any owner of land, lessee of land, or lessee of the game or fishing rights to land who gives permission to another person to hunt, fish, or take wildlife upon the land with or without charge shall be entitled to the same protection from civil liability provided by Article 2 of Chapter 3 of Title 51 for landowners who allow the public to use their land for recreational purposes without charge.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 7; Code 1933, § 45-320; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 65; Code 1933, § 45-501, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 38; Ga. L. 1984, p. 546, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 11; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1076, § 1; Ga. L. 2022, p. 739, § 1/HB 343.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, substituted “$975.00" for “$500.00” in paragraph (c)(1); substituted “$2,000.00” for “$1,000.00” in paragraph (c)(2); and substituted “$3,000.00” for “$2,000.00” in paragraph (c)(3).

Law reviews.

For annual survey on trial practice and procedure, see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 253 (2018).

27-3-1.1.
Acts prohibited on wildlife management areas.

It shall be unlawful for any person on any wildlife management area owned or operated by the department:

To possess a firearm other than a handgun, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1, during a closed hunting season for that area unless such firearm is unloaded and stored in a motor vehicle so as not to be readily accessible or to possess a handgun during a closed hunting season for that area unless such person is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1;

To possess a loaded firearm other than a handgun, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1, in a motor vehicle during a legal open hunting season for that area or to possess a loaded handgun in a motor vehicle during a legal open hunting season for that area unless such person is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1;

To be under the influence of drugs, intoxicating liquors, beers, or wines. The determination of whether any person is under the influence of drugs or intoxicating liquors, beers, or wines may be made in accordance with Code Section 27-3-7;

To hunt within 50 yards of any road which receives regular maintenance for the purpose of public vehicular access;

To target practice, except where an authorized shooting range is made available by the department, and then only in a manner consistent with the rules for shooting ranges promulgated by the board;

To drive a vehicle around a closed gate, cable, sign, or other structure or device intended to prevent vehicular access to a road entering onto or within such an area;

To hunt within any posted safety zone;

To camp upon or drive a motor vehicle over any permanent pasture or area planted in crops;

While hunting bears in any such area opened to bear hunting, to kill a female bear with a cub or cubs or to kill a cub weighing less than 75 pounds;

To fail to report if he or she kills a deer, bear, or turkey in the manner specified by the rules of the department for that wildlife management area on the date killed to the state game and fish checking station on the area;

To construct any tree stand or to hunt from any tree stand except a portable or natural tree stand; or

To trap except with a special trapping permit issued by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

27-3-1.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 1729, § 8; Ga. L. 1993, p. 91, § 27; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1134, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 140, § 27; Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 2-13/SB 308; Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 14/SB 319.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 12, 2022, substituted “is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1” for “possesses a valid weapons carry license issued pursuant to Code Section 16-11-129” at the end of paragraphs (1) and (2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 3-1/SB 308, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to all offenses committed on and after June 4, 2010, and shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before June 4, 2010, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 1/SB 319, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Chairman John Meadows Act.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 2/SB 319, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and determines that:

“(1) The Second Amendment to the United States Constitution recognizes the right of the people to keep and bear arms and that such right shall not be infringed; and

“(2) The people of this state, to perpetuate the principles of free government, insure justice to all, preserve peace, promote the interest and happiness of the citizen and of the family, and transmit to posterity the enjoyment of liberty, provided that the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed but that the General Assembly shall have power to prescribe the manner in which arms may be borne.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Crimes and Offenses,” see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 131 (2011).

27-3-2.
Hunting at night.

It shall be unlawful to hunt at night any game bird or game animal in this state except for alligators, raccoons, opossums, foxes, and bobcats. Any light used to hunt raccoons, opossums, foxes, or bobcats shall be carried on the person of a hunter, affixed to a helmet or hat worn by a hunter, or be part of a belt system worn by a hunter.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 17; Code 1933, § 45-322; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1005, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 67; Ga. L. 1962, p. 671, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 497, § 19; Code 1933, § 45-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 40; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 8; Ga. L. 2009, p. 48, § 1/SB 111.

27-3-3.
Hours for hunting migratory game birds.

It shall be unlawful to hunt migratory game birds between sunset and one-half hour before sunrise. It shall also be unlawful to hunt migratory game birds between one-half hour before sunrise and sunset, except that it shall not be unlawful to hunt migratory game birds during those hours as may be designated by the board for a particular migratory game bird. In accordance with the framework of open hunting season dates established by the United States Fish and Wildlife Service, and as may be appropriate based on sound wildlife management principles, the board is specifically authorized to promulgate rules and regulations establishing the hours, on a state-wide, regional, or local basis, for hunting migratory game birds. The board is specifically authorized to promulgate such rules and regulations without complying with Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” and all rules and regulations promulgated by the board pursuant to this Code section shall be effective immediately upon adoption.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-502, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 41.

27-3-4.
Legal weapons for hunting wildlife generally; use of silencers and suppressors prohibited; penalty for violations.

It shall be unlawful to hunt wildlife with any weapon, except that:

Longbows, recurve bows, crossbows, and compound bows may be used for taking small game, feral hogs, or big game. Arrows for hunting deer, bear, and feral hogs must be broadhead type;

During primitive weapon hunts or primitive weapons seasons:

Longbows, recurve bows, crossbows, compound bows, muzzleloading firearms of .30 caliber or larger, and muzzleloading shotguns of 20 gauge or larger loaded with single shot may be used; and

Youth under 16 years of age may hunt deer with any firearm legal for hunting deer;

Firearms for hunting deer and bear are limited to 20 gauge shotguns or larger shotguns loaded with slugs or buckshot (except that no buckshot is permitted on state wildlife management areas unless otherwise specified), muzzleloading firearms of .30 caliber or larger, and center-fire firearms .22 caliber or larger; provided, however, that firearms for hunting feral hogs, other than those weapons specified in this paragraph, may be authorized by rule or regulation of the board. Bullets used in all center-fire rifles and handguns must be of the expanding type;

Weapons for hunting small game shall be limited to shotguns with shot shell size of no greater than 3 1/2 inches in length with No. 2 lead shot or smaller or federally approved nontoxic shot size of F or smaller shot, .22 caliber or smaller rimfire firearms, air rifles, muzzleloading firearms, longbows, recurve bows, crossbows, and compound bows; provided, however, that in addition to the weapons listed in this paragraph, any center-fire firearm of .17 caliber or larger may be used for hunting fox and bobcat. For hunting migratory game birds, shotguns are limited to a capacity of not more than three shells in the magazine and chamber combined. Further, the plug shall be of a single piece incapable of being removed through the loading end of the magazine. Nothing contained in this paragraph shall permit the taking of protected species;

It shall be unlawful to hunt turkey with any weapons except shotguns using No. 2 shot or smaller, muzzleloading firearms, longbows, crossbows, recurve bows, or compound bows. Any person taking turkey in violation of this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished as for a misdemeanor, except that a fine imposed for such violation shall not be less than $250.00;

Weapons for hunting alligators shall be limited to hand-held ropes or snares, snatch hooks, harpoons, gigs, or arrows with restraining lines attached. Lawfully restrained alligators may be killed with any caliber handgun or bangstick and shall be killed immediately before transporting;

There are no firearms restrictions for taking nongame animals, nongame birds, or feral hogs;

The use of silencers or suppressors for hunting within this state is prohibited; provided, however, that a silencer or suppressor may be used for hunting on the private property of the person using such silencer or suppressor, on private property for which the owner of such property has provided verifiable permission to the person using such silencer or suppressor, and on public lands in areas designated by the department; and

For purposes of this subsection, the term “air gun” means any pistol, handgun, or shoulder-held device, each of not less than 0.30 caliber, or air bow that propels a projectile in the form of a slug, shot, or arrow equipped with a broadhead utilizing unignited compressed air or gas. Air guns are legal weapons for hunting big game only during primitive weapon hunts, primitive weapon seasons, and firearm seasons. This paragraph shall stand repealed effective July 1, 2025, unless continued in effect by the General Assembly prior to that date. At its 2025 regular session, the General Assembly shall review this paragraph to determine whether it should be continued in effect.

It shall be illegal to use a silencer or suppressor for hunting in violation of paragraph (8) of subsection (a) of this Code section. A person who violates the provisions of this paragraph shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

The hunting privileges of any person who has been convicted of violating the provisions of this title or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant thereto by hunting without landowner permission, hunting in an area that is closed for hunting, or hunting big game out of season or at night with a firearm equipped with a suppressor shall be suspended for three years.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-503, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 816, § 42; Ga. L. 1979, p. 591, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 678, § 25; Ga. L. 1979, p. 828, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 730, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 6; Ga. L. 1983, p. 664, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 27; Ga. L. 1989, p. 1552, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 8, § 27; Ga. L. 1990, p. 380, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2863, § 5; Ga. L. 1994, p. 496, § 2; Ga. L. 1995, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 592, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 11; Ga. L. 1999, p. 81, § 27; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1013, § 12; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1179, § 4; Ga. L. 2003, p. 654, § 9; Ga. L. 2006, p. 226, § 2/HB 338; Ga. L. 2010, p. 952, § 3/SB 474; Ga. L. 2013, p. 538, § 2/HB 207; Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 1-2A/HB 60; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 6/HB 475; Ga. L. 2019, p. 808, § 3/SB 72; Ga. L. 2020, p. 827, § 4-1/HB 998; Ga. L. 2021, p. 105, § 2-3/HB 362; Ga. L. 2022, p. 308, § 4/HB 1233.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, deleted former paragraph (a)(5), which read: “For hunting game animals other than deer and bear, shotguns shall be limited to a capacity of not more than three shells in the magazine and chamber combined. If a plug is necessary to so limit the capacity, the plug shall be of one piece, incapable of being removed through the loading end of the magazine;”; redesignated former paragraphs (a)(6) through (a)(9) as present paragraphs (a)(5) through (a)(8), respectively; and added paragraph (a)(9).

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, in paragraph (a)(9), substituted “July 1, 2025” for “July 1, 2020” in the third sentence and substituted “its 2025 regular session” for “its 2020 regular session” at the beginning of the fourth sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective April 27, 2021, substituted “.30 caliber” for “.44 caliber” in subparagraph (a)(2)(A) and in the middle of the first sentence of paragraph (a)(3).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added the second and third sentences in paragraph (a)(4).

Cross references.

Offenses involving leaving children abandoned or unattended in motor vehicles generally,
§

16-11-100

et seq.

Carrying and possessing firearms generally, §

16-11-120

et seq.

Prohibition against taking fish by means of firearms, §

27-4-8

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “and” was deleted at the end of paragraph (a)(7) and “; and” was substituted for the period at the end of paragraph (a)(8).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, “paragraph (8)” was substituted for “paragraph (9)” in paragraph (b)(1).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 664, §§ 1 and 2 purported to amend Code Section 27-2-4 but actually amended Code Section 27-3-4.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 1/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Feral Hog Control Act.’ ”

Ga. L. 2015, p. 1352, § 2/HB 475, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The General Assembly finds that feral hogs are an invasive species in Georgia and are detrimental to the natural resources and agricultural production of the state.
Feral hogs cause significant damage to crops and wildlife habitat.
In addition, as carriers of communicable diseases, feral hogs pose a health risk to humans, livestock, companion animals, pets, and native wildlife.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 47 (2014).

27-3-5.
[Reserved] Legal weapons for hunting certain animals.

History.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141, § 27/HB 79, reserved the designation of this Code section, effective April 24, 2013; repealed by Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 7, effective July 1, 1981.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 7 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective July 1, 1981.

27-3-6.
Possession of firearm while hunting with bow and arrow.

It shall be unlawful for any person to possess any center-fire or rimfire firearm other than a handgun, as such term is defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1, while hunting with a bow and arrow during archery or primitive weapons season for deer or while hunting with a muzzleloading firearm during a primitive weapons season for deer or to possess a loaded handgun while hunting with a bow and arrow during archery or primitive weapons season for deer or while hunting with a muzzleloading firearm during primitive weapons season for deer unless such person is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1.

History.

Code 1933, § 45-505, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 783, § 12; Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 2-14/SB 308; Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 15/SB 319.

The 2022 amendment,

effective April 12, 2022, substituted “is a lawful weapons carrier as defined in Code Section 16-11-125.1” for “possesses a valid weapons carry license issued pursuant to Code Section 16-11-129” at the end of this Code section.

Cross references.

Dangerous instrumentalities and practices, §

16-11-100

et seq.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 963, § 3-1/SB 308, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section shall apply to all offenses committed on and after June 4, 2010, and shall not affect any prosecutions for acts occurring before June 4, 2010, and shall not act as an abatement of any such prosecutions.

Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 1/SB 319, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Chairman John Meadows Act.’”

Ga. L. 2022, p. 74, § 2/SB 319, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and determines that:

“(1) The Second Amendment to the United States Constitution recognizes the right of the people to keep and bear arms and that such right shall not be infringed; and

“(2) The people of this state, to perpetuate the principles of free government, insure justice to all, preserve peace, promote the interest and happiness of the citizen and of the family, and transmit to posterity the enjoyment of liberty, provided that the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed but that the General Assembly shall have power to prescribe the manner in which arms may be borne.”

Law reviews.

For article, “Crimes and Offenses,” see 27 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 131 (2011).

27-3-7.
Hunting under the influence of alcohol or drugs.

As used in this Code section, the term “hunt” or “hunting” means the act of hunting, as such term is defined in Code Section 27-1-2, while in possession of or using a firearm, bow, or any other device which serves to launch a projectile.

(a.1)

As used in this Code section, the term “alcohol concentration” means grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood or grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath.

A person shall not hunt while:

Under the influence of alcohol to the extent that it is less safe for the person to hunt;

Under the influence of any drug to the extent that it is less safe for the person to hunt;

Under the combined influence of alcohol and any drug to the extent that it is less safe for the person to hunt;

The person’s alcohol concentration is 0.08 grams or more at any time within three hours after such hunting from alcohol consumed before such hunting ended; or

Subject to the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section, there is any amount of marijuana or a controlled substance, as defined in Code Section 16-13-21, present in the person’s blood or urine, or both, including the metabolites and derivatives of each or both without regard to whether or not any alcohol is present in the person’s breath or blood.

The fact that any person charged with violating this Code section is or has been legally entitled to use a drug shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this Code section; provided, however, that such person shall not be in violation of this Code section unless such person is rendered incapable of hunting safely as a result of using a drug other than alcohol which such person is legally entitled to use.

Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person in violation of subsection (b) of this Code section, evidence of the amount of alcohol or drug in a person’s blood, urine, breath, or other bodily substance at the alleged time, as determined by a chemical analysis of the person’s blood, urine, breath, or other bodily substance shall be admissible. Where such a chemical test is made, the following provisions shall apply:

Chemical analysis of the person’s blood, urine, breath, or other bodily substance, to be considered valid under this Code section, shall have been performed according to methods approved by the Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation on a machine which was operated with all the electronic and operating components prescribed by its manufacturer properly attached and in good working order and by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the Division of Forensic Sciences for this purpose. The Division of Forensic Sciences of the Georgia Bureau of Investigation shall approve satisfactory techniques or methods to ascertain the qualifications and competence of individuals to conduct analyses and to issue permits, along with requirements for properly operating and maintaining any testing instruments, and to issue certificates certifying that instruments have met those requirements, which certificates and permits shall be subject to termination or revocation at the discretion of the Division of Forensic Sciences;

When a person undergoes a chemical test at the request of a law enforcement officer, only a physician, registered nurse, laboratory technician, emergency medical technician, or other qualified person may withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content therein, provided that this limitation shall not apply to the taking of breath or urine specimens. No physician, registered nurse, or other qualified person or employer thereof shall incur any civil or criminal liability as a result of the medically proper obtaining of such blood specimens when requested in writing by a law enforcement officer;

The person tested may have a physician or a qualified technician, chemist, registered nurse, or other qualified person of his or her own choosing administer a chemical test or tests in addition to any administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer. The justifiable failure or inability to obtain an additional test shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the test or tests taken at the direction of a law enforcement officer; and

Upon the request of the person who shall submit to a chemical test or tests at the request of a law enforcement officer, full information concerning the test or tests shall be made available to such person or such person’s attorney. The arresting officer at the time of arrest shall advise the person arrested of his or her rights to a chemical test or tests according to this Code section.

In the event of a hunting accident involving a fatality, the investigating coroner or medical examiner having jurisdiction shall direct that a chemical blood test to determine the alcohol concentration or the presence of drugs be performed on the dead person and that the results of such test be properly recorded on his or her report.

Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by any person hunting in violation of subsection (b) of this Code section, the amount of alcohol in the person’s blood at the time alleged, as shown by chemical analysis of the person’s blood, urine, breath, or other bodily substance, shall give rise to the following presumptions:

If there was at that time an alcohol concentration of 0.05 grams or less, it shall be presumed that the person was not under the influence of alcohol, as prohibited by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section;

If there was at that time an alcohol concentration in excess of 0.05 grams but less than 0.08 grams, such fact shall not give rise to any presumption that the person was or was not under the influence of alcohol, as prohibited by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section, but such fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of alcohol, as prohibited by paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subsection (b) of this Code section; and

If there was at that time or within three hours after hunting, from alcohol consumed before such hunting ended, an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more grams, the person shall be in violation of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

Any person who exercises the privilege of hunting in this state shall be deemed to have given consent, subject to subsection (d) of this Code section, to a chemical test or tests of his or her blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or any other drug, if arrested for any offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while such person was hunting in violation of subsection (b) of this Code section. Subject to subsection (d) of this Code section, the requesting law enforcement officer shall designate which test or tests shall be administered.

At the time a chemical test or tests are requested, the arresting officer shall read to the person the following implied consent warning:

“The State of Georgia has conditioned your license to hunt in this state upon your submission to state administered chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances for the purpose of determining if you are under the influence of alcohol or drugs. If you refuse this testing and you are convicted of hunting while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, your ability to lawfully hunt in this state will be suspended for a period of two years. Your refusal to submit to blood or urine testing may be offered into evidence against you at trial. If you submit to testing and the results indicate an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more and if you are subsequently convicted of hunting under the influence of alcohol by having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more at any time within three hours after hunting from alcohol consumed before such hunting ended, your ability to lawfully hunt in this state will be suspended for a period of one year. After first submitting to the requested state tests, you are entitled to additional chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances at your own expense and from qualified personnel of your own choosing. Will you submit to the state administered chemical tests of your

(designate which test?)

”

Any person who is dead, unconscious, or otherwise in a condition rendering such person incapable of refusal shall be deemed not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (g) of this Code section, and the test or tests may be administered, subject to subsection (d) of this Code section.

If a person refuses, upon the request of a law enforcement officer, to submit to a chemical test designated by the law enforcement officer as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, no test shall be given; provided, however, that subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) and (3) of this subsection, such refusal shall be admissible in any legal action; and provided, further, that upon conviction of a violation of subsection (b) of this Code section, in addition to any other punishment imposed, such person’s privileges to hunt in this state shall be suspended by operation of law for a period of two years. The fact that such person was not in possession of a valid hunting license at the time of the violation shall have no effect on the suspension of his or her hunting privilege.

If in any legal action a party desires to present evidence of the refusal of a person charged with violating subsection (b) of this Code section to submit to a chemical test designated by a law enforcement officer as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, the party desiring to present such evidence shall request the judge presiding over such legal proceeding to hold a hearing to determine the admissibility of such evidence after notice to the person alleged to have refused to submit to such testing and to the law enforcement officer.

The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the following issues:

Whether the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person was hunting while under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance and was lawfully placed under arrest for violating subsection (b) of this Code section;

Whether at the time of the request for the test or tests the officer informed the person of the person’s implied consent rights and the consequence of submitting or refusing to submit to such test; and

Whether the person refused to submit to the test.

It shall be unlawful during any period of a person’s hunting privilege suspension for such person to:

Hunt without a license in violation of Code Section 27-2-1;

Possess a current Georgia hunting license; or

Hunt in any situation where a hunting license is not required.

Any person convicted of hunting while intoxicated while his or her hunting privileges are suspended pursuant to this subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

Nothing in this Code section shall be deemed to preclude the acquisition or admission of evidence of a violation of this Code section if the evidence was obtained by voluntary consent or a search warrant as authorized by the Constitution or the laws of this state or the United States.

Upon the request of a law enforcement officer, if a person consents to submit to a chemical test designated by such officer as provided in subsection (g) of this Code section, and the results of such test indicate an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more, upon a conviction of a violation of paragraph (4) of subsection (b) of this Code section, in addition to any other punishment imposed, such person’s privileges to hunt in this state shall be suspended by operation of law for a period of one year. Even if such person did not possess a valid hunting license at the time of the violation, such person’s hunting privileges shall be suspended for one year.

Following the period of suspension set forth in subsection (i) or (k) of this Code section, such person may apply to the department for reinstatement of his or her hunting privileges. Any suspension pursuant to this Code section shall remain in effect until such person submits proof of completion of a DUI Alcohol or Drug Use Risk Reduction Program certified by the Department of Driver Services and pays a restoration fee of $200.00, unless such conviction was a recidivist conviction, in which case the restoration fee shall be $500.00.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 327, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 56; Code 1933, § 45-506, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 1134, § 2; Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 3/SB 136; Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 2/HB 783; Ga. L. 2019, p. 295, § 1/HB 471; Ga. L. 2020, p. 827, § 2-2/HB 998.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 28, 2019, substituted the present provisions of paragraph (g)(2) for the former provisions, which read: “At the time a chemical test or tests are requested, the arresting officer shall read to the person the following implied consent warning:

“‘Georgia law requires you to submit to state administered chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances for the purpose of determining if you are under the influence of alcohol or drugs. If you refuse this testing and you are convicted of hunting while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, your privilege to hunt in this state will be suspended for a period of two years. Your refusal to submit to the required testing may be offered into evidence against you at trial. If you submit to testing and the results indicate an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more and if you are subsequently convicted of hunting under the influence of alcohol by having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 grams or more at any time within three hours after hunting from alcohol consumed before such hunting ended, your privilege to hunt in this state will be suspended for a period of one year. After first submitting to the required state tests, you are entitled to additional chemical tests of your blood, breath, urine, or other bodily substances at your own expense and from qualified personnel of your own choosing. Will you submit to the state administered chemical tests of your

(designate which tests)

under the implied consent law?’”

The 2020 amendment,

effective August 5, 2020, added subsection (a.1); substituted “an alcohol concentration” for “a blood alcohol concentration” throughout subsection (f); and substituted “requested state tests” for “required state tests” in the fifth sentence of the warning in paragraph (g)(2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, “designate which tests” was underlined near the end of paragraph (g)(2).

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, “alcohol concentration” was substituted for “blood alcohol concentration” in subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 92, § 14/SB 136, not codified by the General Assembly, provides, in part, that the amendment of this Code section by that Act “shall apply to all offenses occurring on and after May 15, 2013; provided, however, that for purposes of determining the number of prior convictions or pleas of nolo contendere pursuant to the felony provisions of paragraph (4) of subsection (m) of Code Section 52-7-12, only those offenses for which a conviction or a plea of nolo contendere is obtained on or after May 15, 2013, shall be considered.”

Ga. L. 2014, p. 344, § 5/HB 783, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on May 1, 2014, and shall apply to offenses occurring on or after such date.”

27-3-8.
Unlawful devices.

It shall be unlawful for any person to make use of any pitfall, deadfall, catch, snare, trap, net, salt lick, blind pig, baited hook, or other device for the purpose of taking any game animal or game bird or any other wildlife, except as otherwise provided in this title or by rule or regulation of the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1911, p. 137, § 17; Code 1933, § 45-322; Ga. L. 1949, p. 1005, § 1; Ga. L. 1952, p. 362, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 483, § 62; Ga. L. 1972, p. 925, § 2; Code 1933, § 45-507, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 396, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 798, § 8.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Hunting regulations, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Georgia Department of Natural Resources, Subject 391-4-2.